Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,101.01
Violations; costs of enforcement.

All actual costs associated with seizing any weighing and measuring device or commodity which is in violation of the Weights and Measures Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, issuing and enforcing any stop-use, hold, or removal order for commercial weighing and measuring devices, issuing and enforcing any stop-sale, hold, or removal order for commodities, and stopping commercial vehicles shall be incurred by the owner of such commodity or weighing and measuring device. The department shall not be liable for any actual or incidental costs incurred by any person due to such departmental actions or in enforcing the act. The department shall be reimbursed by the owner for the actual cost incurred by the department in seizing any weighing and measuring device or commodity, issuing and enforcing any stop-use, hold, or removal order for commercial weighing and measuring devices, issuing and enforcing any stop-sale, hold, or removal order for commodities, and stopping commercial vehicles.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 32.